Utah statutes.
23-21a-4.   Payment of fair market value to landowners -- Impartial appraisal.

The state of Utah, through condemnation, will pay to the landowners a sum equal to the fair market value, as determined by impartial appraisal, for their right, title and interest in and to the surface of said lands.

